Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 702.200 is amended to read:
702.200. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate  sports”
includes the National Collegiate Athletic Association.
(b) “Post-secondary institution of education” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(B) An Oregon-based, generally accredited, private institution of higher education.
(c)(A) “Student’s rights” means the rights of a  student enrolled in a post-secondary institution
of education to earn compensation for use of the student’s name,  image , [ or] likeness  or athletic
reputation and to contract with and retain professional representation or an athlete agent.
(B) “Student’s rights” does not include a right to receive compensation from a post-secondary
institution of education.
(2)(a) Except as provided in this section, a post-secondary institution of education  or an athletic
association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports may not:
[(a)] (A) Prohibit, prevent or restrict a student athlete from exercising the student’s rights.
[(b)] (B) Penalize or retaliate against a student athlete for exercising the student’s rights.
[(c)] (C) Prohibit a student athlete from participating in an  intercollegiate sport for exercising
the student’s rights.
[(d)] (D) Impose an eligibility requirement on a scholarship or  grant that requires a student
athlete to refrain from exercising the student’s rights.
[(e)] (E) Prohibit a student athlete from receiving food, drink, lodging or  medical expenses or
insurance coverage from a third  party as compensation for use of the student’s name, image , [ or]
likeness or athletic reputation .
(b) Except as  provided in this section, an athletic association, conference or organization
with authority over intercollegiate sports may not:
(A) Prevent a post-secondary institution of education or a student athlete  from partic-
ipating in intercollegiate sports, accept a complaint, open an investigation  or take any other
adverse action against a post-secondary institution  of education or a student athlete as a
result of a violation, or an alleged violation, of the rules  or regulations of the athletic asso-
Enrolled House Bill 4119 (HB 4119-INTRO) Page 1
ciation, conference or organization related to a student athlete  exercising the student’s
rights.
(B) Authorize, cause or allow any post-secondary institution of education that is a
member of the association, conference or organization  to take an action prohibited under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3)(a) A student athlete may not enter into a contract that provides  compensation to the student
athlete for use of the student athlete’s name, image , [ or] likeness or athletic reputation if terms
of the contract conflict with the student athlete’s team rules or with terms of a  contract entered
into between the student athlete’s post-secondary institution  of education and a third party, except
neither the team rules nor a contract entered into between the post-secondary institution  of educa-
tion and a third  party may prevent a student athlete from earning compensation for use of the stu-
dent athlete’s name, image , [ or] likeness or athletic reputation when not engaged in official team
activities, including participating in or being part of an advertisement that  was created while not
engaged in official team activities but that may otherwise be broadcasted, displayed or disseminated
at any time.
(b) A student athlete who enters into a  contract that provides compensation to the student
athlete for use of the student athlete’s name, image , [ or] likeness or athletic reputation  shall dis-
close the contract to an official of the post-secondary institution of education designated  by the in-
stitution if the student athlete is a team member or, if the student athlete is  not a team member,
at the time the student athlete seeks to become a team member.
(c) If the post-secondary institution of  education asserts that the terms of the contract conflict
with the team rules or with terms of a contract entered into between the student athlete’s post-
secondary institution of education and a third party, the institution shall disclose the specific rules
or terms  asserted to be in conflict to the student athlete or to the student athlete’s professional
representative or athlete agent if the student athlete is represented.
(4) A post-secondary institution  of education or an athletic association, conference or organiza-
tion with authority over intercollegiate sports may not provide  to a prospective or current student
athlete compensation for use of the student athlete’s name, image , [ or] likeness  or athletic repu-
tation.
(5) A student athlete may not contract  with or retain a person as the student athlete’s [ profes-
sional representative or ] athlete agent, if the person represented or was employed  by  a post-
secondary institution of education at any time in the preceding four years.
(6) Nothing in this section prohibits  a post-secondary institution of education from establishing
or enforcing a conduct code that is applicable to all students enrolled at the institution.
(7)(a) A student athlete’s compensation for use of the student’s name, image, likeness
or athletic reputation  may not be conditioned on the athletic performance of the student
athlete.
(b) A person or entity that  provides compensation to a student athlete for the use of the
student athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic reputation may condition payment  of the
compensation on a student athlete’s attendance at a particular post-secondary institution
of education.
(8) An athletic association, conference or organization  with authority over intercollegiate
sports may not prohibit a post-secondary  institution of education from identifying, facilitat-
ing, enabling or supporting opportunities for a current student athlete to exercise  the stu-
dent athlete’s student’s rights at the  student athlete’s post-secondary institution of
education.
(9) A post-secondary institution of education, or an employee of  a post-secondary insti-
tution of education, may not be held  liable for any damages to a student athlete’s ability to
exercise the student athlete’s student’s rights due to any decision or action made  by the
post-secondary institution of education or employee:
(a) That is routinely taken in the course of intercollegiate sports; or
Enrolled House Bill 4119 (HB 4119-INTRO) Page 2
(b) That is part of identifying, facilitating, enabling or  supporting opportunities for the
current student athlete to exercise the student athlete’s  student’s rights at the student
athlete’s post-secondary institution of education.
SECTION 2.  ORS 702.205 is amended to read:
702.205. A person that produces  an intercollegiate sports team jersey, video game or trading
card for the  purpose of making a profit shall make a royalty payment to each student athlete for
use of the  student athlete’s name, image , [or] likeness or athletic reputation  if the person uses the
student athlete’s name, image , [ or] likeness or athletic reputation  in or on the intercollegiate
sports team jersey, video game or trading card.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 702.200 by section  1 of this 2024 Act apply to
any action relating to student’s rights, as defined in ORS 702.200, taken on or after  June 29,
2021.
(2) The amendments to ORS 702.205 by section 2 of this 2024  Act apply to any contract
entered into on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 15, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4119 (HB 4119-INTRO) Page 3